libs/kotext/kohyphen/hyphdicts/hyph_en.dic
ISO8859-1
.ab4i
.1ab
.ab3ol
.abo2
.ace4
.ace2t3
.a2ch4
.ac5t2iva
.a2ct
.ac2t1iv
.ad4d1in
.ad1d4
.ad3di
.ad3e
.a2d3o
.4a2e5d
.aer3i
.aer1
.a2f3f
.a2f3t
.ag4a
.4a2g5n2
.a2ir3
.2ai2
.al5im
.4al1k
.al3le
.all2
.a1m5a2r
.2a2m
.ama5te
.am1at
.am2i
.am3pe
.am2p
.am3ph
.a2n1
.an1a3b
.an2a
.an2a3s
.a4nd2
.an5da
.an4el
.a4n4en
.an4gl2
.a4ng
.an4on.
.an1o
.a4n3s
.an2t3a
.an3t2i3
.4ant4ic
.an4t5o
.a2n2y5
.a3ph5or
.2ap
.a1pho
.ap4i
.ar5ab
.a2r
.ar5ap
.ar4c2i2
.ar1c2
.ar5d
.ar4e
.ar1i4
.ar4ise
.ar4isi
.ar5sen
.a2r2s2
.ar2se
.ar4t5icl2
.art2
.ar1t4ic
.as1
.as4q
.as5s1ib
.a4ss2
.at5a2r
.2a2ta
.ateli4
.ate2l
.at5omi4se
.a2to
.at2om
.atom1i
.at5om1iz
.2a2t3r2
.a2t3t4
.au3b
.2au2
.au3g4u
.aur4e5
.au4r
.aus5
.authen5
.au3th
.authe2
.2av4
.av5era
.aver1
.bap5ti2s1m4
.b2a4p1
.ba2pt2
.bap2t1is
.barri5c4
.ba2r
.b2a4r1r4
.bar3ri
.bas4i
.1bas
.ba5sic
.be3d2i
.b2e
.2b2ed
.be3lo
.1bel
.be5r4a
.ber1
.be5s1m4
.be1s2
.bi4er1
.b4ie2
.blaz5o
.2bl2
.bl2a
.b4l2az2
.bo3lo
.bo2
.bo1s5o2m
.bou4n4d
.bo4u2
.b2oun1
.bov4
.3bra5ch
.br4
.br2e2
.burn5i
.bu4r
.bur2n2
.ca3de
.ca4gin
.ca1g2i
.cam5i
.c2a2m
.ca1m3o
.ca2n1
.can5t2a
.ca5p2itu
.1c2ap
.cap1i
.car4i
.1ca2r
.cas5u1al
.3cas1u3
.cas2ua2
.ca4ti
.c1at
.cen5so
.1cen2
.ce4n2s
.cen5ten1a
.3cent
.cen1te
.cen4t5ri
.cen1tr2
.cer4i
.cer1
.2ch4
.cit4a
.1c2i2
.cle1m5e4
.cl2
.c2le2
.clima5to
.cli1m
.co5i4t
.1c2o2
.c2oi
.co3pa
.cop5ro
.co1pr2
.c4o3r1u
.co3si
.co5ter1
.c2ot
.coty3le5
.5coty
.cri5t2i1c2i2
.cr2
.crit1ic
.cust2om5
.1cus
.c4ust2
.cus1to4
.3d2av5
.dea5c2o2
.dea2
.de5lec
.d2ele
.del5eg
.de3li
.de3l2i5r
.1d4e1m
.de5nit
.den1i
.de3n1o
.der2
.de3ra
.de5re4s
.d4er2e
.1de3ri
.de5sc2r2ib
.5de2sc2
.descr2
.de5ser1v2
.deser1
.de5signe
.des4i
.des2i4g
.desi2gn2
.de5s2ir
.de5s1is2
.de5sp2oi
.des1p
.des2po
.determ5i
.1de1t
.deter2
.de3ve
.de4w
.di4al.
.1d2i1a2
.dia3s
.di4at
.din4a
.2d1in
.di2o5c
.3d2i1o2
.1do2
.do4e
.domest5
.d2om
.dom2e
.do2me2s
.du4al.
.1du
.d2ua2
.du1al
.3d4u4c
.d4y2s3
.2d2y
.eas4t5
.ea2
.ech1in5
.ech3i
.e2ch
.e1c2o3
.e2c3t
.e1d5em
.2ed
.ede2
.ed4it.
.ed1it
.ed4iti
.eg4
.ei3d4
.e2i5r
.e2l3ev3
.2ele
.el2i
.elu5s4
.e1lu
.e2m3b
.em5in
.em1p4
.em5p4y
.en1
.en5c
.en4d2ed
.2e4nd
.ende2
.e4n3s
.ent2
.en5ta
.eo1s5
.epi1
.epi3d
.er2a
.er1
.er5em5
.2er2e
.er4i4
.er4o2
.eros4
.er2ot3
.er4ri
.e4r1r4
.es1
.esc1al5
.e2sc2
.es1ca
.es3p
.es3t2
.eter2n5
.eter2
.eth3e2
.e2th1
.eu1
.eu4r4
.eval3
.evol5ut
.e1vo
.evo2l
.ew4
.ex1
.ex3a
.eye3
.fal4le
.1f2a
.fall2
.far4i
.5fa2r
.fec5un2da
.3fec
.fecun1
.fecu4nd
.f2e4n4d
.feo2ff5
.feof2
.fi2
.fi5l2i1a2
.1fi2l
.fil5tr2
.fi1n5e4ss
.2fin
.fin2e
.fine4s
.f1i4n3g
.fi5n4it
.f2in1i
.fi2s4c5
.3f2o3c
.1fo
.fran5ch
.1fr2
.fra2n
.fu5g4a
.3fu
.g2a4m
.ga1m5e2t
.gam2e
.gen4et
.3gen
.g4ene
.ge5neti
.gen5i1a2
.gen1i
.ge3ro
.ger1
.glor5i3o2
.2gl2
.3glo
.glor1i
.gnost4
.2gn2
.g2no
.gno4s
.go3no
.3gos3
.h1ab2
.ha2
.ha5bili
.hab1il
.hama5
.h2a4m
.han4de2
.ha2n
.ha4nd
.hast5i
.hast2
.h4e4i
.he2
.hem5a
.hi2
.hi3b
.ho2l
.ho5rol
.hov3
.hy3lo
.h2y
.hy2l
.ico3s
.2i2c2o2
.idi2
.i2d
.2ig3
.i2g1n2
.il4i
.i2m5b
.in1
.2i4n3d
.in3e2
.2in2i
.2in3o
.in3t
.inve2st5i
.in3v2
.inve2
.invest2
.i4r3r4
.2ir
.i2s4c2
.is4li
.i2s1l4
.is4o
.i1s2o5m
.ka5ro
.ka2r
.ki4e2
.kin3e
.k1in
.lab4o2
.l2a
.l1ab
.la4m2e
.l2a2m
.lam5enta
.la3men
.lan5i
.la2n
.lash4e2
.l4as
.las2h
.le4m
.len5t2i
.le2p
.le1p5r2
.les5son
.3le4s4s
.les2so
.le5va2n
.2lev
.l3eva
.libra2r5
.lib1r4
.lig3a
.1l2ig
.l2i3o2
.li4o4n1s2
.l2i4p
.loc3a
.1l2oc
.lo4g2i1a2
.1l2o1g
.lo3g2i
.lo2p
.loph3
.lous5i
.lo4u2
.lov5er1
.lub3
.ly1o3
.2ly
.mac5u
.mal5ad5
.mal2a
.ma5l1in
.mar5ti
.1ma2r
.mart2
.m4a2th5
.me5lo3d2i1o2
.m2e
.melo4di
.ment4
.1men
.men5ta
.me5r2i2d
.mer1
.me5r3in
.met4er2
.1me2t
.met1e
.mi4e2
.mi3gr2
.m2ig
.min5ue
.m2in2u
.mir2k4
.m2ir
.mis1
.mi5to
.mi2t
.mo3b2i
.1mo
.mo5le2c4
.mon3a4
.m4on
.mor5ti
.m2ort2
.mu3n2i
.mun1
.mu3si
.mus2i5c2o2
.myth3
.2my
.3myt
.n2a5k2
.n1a
.nar1i4
.na2r
.nast4
.n2as
.nas5ti
.ne2c3t
.ni4c
.n1i
.ni5tro
.n2itr2
.n2o4c
.no2m3o
.n2om
.nos3t2
.no5t1ic
.n2ot
.nuc2le5
.n2u
.5n4uc
.nuc3l2
.o2b2ed5
.ob2e
.o1b3e4l
.o2b3l2
.od4
.o2e4d5
.oe5so
.o2f5t
.2oi4
.ol4d
.om2e2
.2om
.om5el
.on4ce
.on1c
.o2n4e
.op2i
.op2t5a
.1o2p1t2
.or1
.or4at4
.or1a
.ora5tor1i
.orat1or5
.ora2to
.or5che2
.or4ch
.or1c2
.or3d
.2or2e4
.or3eo
.or4i
.orn1er4
.or2n2
.or2o
.os1
.osi4
.4oth5
.2ot
.out1
.o4u2
.ov4
.pal5i
.para5di4s1
.1pa2r
.par2ad
.par5af
.par1a5t
.p2a5ta
.pa4t2io2
.pe2c3t4
.pecu3
.3ped3e2
.2p2ed
.p2e4nd4
.pen5de2
.pe2p3t2
.per3i5n
.p4eri
.per1
.per3se5c
.pe2r1s2
.per2se
.pe5titi
.3pet
.pe2ti
.ph2
.phe5n2o2m
.phe4
.phen1o
.phon4i
.1pho
.ph2o4n
.p2i2e2
.pi3l3a
.p2il
.plast4
.p2l2
.1pl2a
.pl4as
.plic4
.plica4
.plos4
.po3l2a
.1po
.po5lite
.pol2it
.po2p
.p4op5l2
.po5si1t2io2
.3p4os
.pos1it
.pos5si
.po4s1s2
.pro5bat
.1pr2
.pr4oba
.pu4r4r4
.pu4r
.put4te
.pu2t1t4
.ra5cem
.ran5g2i
.ra2n
.ra4ng
.re3c2a
.r2e
.r2ef5er2e
.re2fe
.re1f
.refer1
.re5ga2r
.re1i4
.re5lin
.re1m
.re5o
.res5c2i2
.re2sc2
.re5sen
.re5s2po
.re5stat
.rest2
.r2e5s4t2or2e
.rest1or
.re5st4r2
.re3t2a
.re5u
.re3w
.rib5a
.2r2ib
.rin4
.rit2
.rol4l2a
.roll2
.r4os3a
.sa2
.sac5r2
.sal4i
.sa2l
.sa5l1in
.salt5er1
.s4al4t
.sal1te
.sanc5
.sa2n
.s4ap5a
.s3ap
.sa3vo
.s2av
.sci3e2
.sc2
.s1c2i2
.sea3s4
.se2a2
.se2ct4
.sec5to
.se3gr2
.sen3t
.se1q
.ser4ie2
.ser1
.s2es1
.sev5era
.3sev
.sever1
.s2h2
.si5g2no
.s2i4g
.si2gn2
.s1is3
.st4
.sta2t4o
.stra5to
.str2
.str4in2g5i
.stri4ng
.su5d4a
.sulph5a2
.1s2ul
.sulph2
.sul3t
.tact4i
.ta2ct
.tac5t2ic
.t2a4m
.ta1ma2r5
.tar5o
.ta2r
.te2ct4
.tel5a
.te2l
.tell5e
.1tell2
.te4m
.te5ra5t
.ter1
.ter4p
.th4
.tho4
.thol4
.ti2
.til4
.t2i5n1i
.t1in
.t3i2t4is
.t1or1
.tran4c
.tr2
.tra2n
.tri5bal
.t2r2ib
.tri3d
.trin4a
.t4ri5sti
.trist2
.tro4ph
.tr2op
.tro1ph5o
.tro4v
.tula2r5
.tu1l2a
.tur1b4
.tu4r
.tur1i4
.tu5te
.1tut
.tu3t2o
.4ul4l2
.ulti5mat
.ultim4a
.ul1tim
.un5ce
.un1
.un5ch
.u4n3d2
.under5
.unde2
.un3e
.u4n3g
.u1ni3c
.un2i
.un2i3o2
.u4n3k4
.u4n5s4
.un3t4
.un5u4
.2up1
.up3l2
.ur1a4
.u4r
.ur5e2th1
.ur1e2t
.ur2e
.ur4o
.va5l2ed
.1v2ale
.ve2
.vec5
.ve5lo
.2vel
.vent5il
.vent2i
.v5er4ie2
.ver1
.ver3n2
.vic5to
.vic2
.5vi2ct2
.vi2s
.vis3i
.vi5so
.v2o1c
.1vo
.vo5lut
.vo2l
.wine5s
.wi2
.win2e
.xy3l
.za5r
.z1a1
a4a
1ab
2ab.
2aba
ab5ar2e
aba2r
ab4ay4
2a2b1b2
ab5ber1
abb2e
2ab2e4
ab3erd
aber1
a5b3e4r1r4
a3bet
ab1ic
a3b4ie2
2abin
4a1b2i2o2
abi5on
ab3it1a
ab4itu
ab3l2a
a2bl2
abli4
4abolic
abo2
abol3i
ab3om
ab3ota
ab2ot
3about
abo4u2
ab1r4
2abs.
a4b1s2
ab1ul
abu4lo
ab3use
ab3usi
2a2by
ac2a
ac5a2bl2
ac1ab
ac3al
5ac1anth2
aca2n
ac5ard
a1ca2r
a5c1at
ach5al
a2ch
acha2
a5ch2in1i
ach1in
ach5i2s1m4
achro4
a3c2hr
ach5u4r4
2a1c2i2
a4cic
aci4e2r1s2
aci3er1
acie2
ac2i3f4
4acit
ack5a
ack1
ac3li
acl2
4a4co.
a1c2o2
aco3d
ac5on1r
acon1
4acos
4aco4u2
ac1r2
ac3r2y2
act5ate
a2ct
ac2ta
act5ile
ac2to
act5o2r2y
act1or
ac2t5r2
ac5uat
ac2ua2
a5d2ai2
a3d2a3v
4adee
ad5en1i
ad4ha2
a4d1h
ad3ica
a5d2i1f
4adil4
adi4op
a3d2i1o2
ad2i4p
adis4i
adi4s1
a3diti
3adju
ad1j
5admi2t
a2d1m
a2do
4adoe
4ad2oi
ad3ol
a3d4os
ad1ow
ad1r2
a3dr2a2m4
4a2du
ad3u1l2a
ad3um
4a2d2y
ae5a2
ae4cit
ae1c2i2
ae1c2o3
4a2ed
aed5i4s1
ae5g
ae3on
ae5p
aero2d2y5
aer1
aer2od
ae4s
ae5si
aes3t2
aet4a
ae2th4
aet4or.
aet1or
aev3a
4af.
4afe
af5ta
a2ft
a4fu
ag4ar1i
aga2r
4ageri
ager1
a5ghe2
a2gh
a5g2i1a2
a1g2i
agi4as
4ag2ino
4a2gl2
agli4
4a2g1n2
ag3on1i
agor4a
ag5ot
a2gr2
ag3ri
a3gru5
2ah
a1h2a2
aha2r2
aha5r1a
a1he2
a2h4n2
a5h2oo
2ai2
4ai.
a2i3a2
a1ic
aid4a
ai2d
aid5er1
a2ig2
ai5gu
ai2l3er1
ail3o
aim5er1
aim2e
ain5de2r3s2
a2i4nd
ainde2
ainder1
a4i5nea2
a3ing.
ai4ng
a2in3i
a2in5o
aint5er1
ain1te
air5a
a2ir
air5p
ai2r3s2
ais1i
a5i2s1m4
2a1j
a4ju
2ak
akel4
ak5u
al5a2bl2
al2a
al1ab
ala2ct4
al4ac
a1l4ae
al5ais
al2ai2
ala3ma
al2a2m
al5ance
ala2n
al3at
a5l2av
al2c3at
al1c2
al3ch
ald5ri
aldr2
2ale
a3lec
aleg4
ale5ma
al5end4e2
al2e4nd
a1leo
a2let
al3ib1r4
ali4c2i2
al5i4c5s4
al1i2d
al3i1f
5a1l2ig
al1in
a5l2in1i
al2in5o
al5ipe
al2ip
al5ip2ot
ali3po
4alis.
al1is
4al2i1u2
4alk
alk5ie2
al4l1ab
all2
al1l2a
al4lag
alli5a2n
al1li
all2i1a2
al1l2ig4
al4lis2h
all1is
a5loe
al3o1gr2
a1l2o1g
a3l2om
a3l2oo
al1or
al4orim
alor1i
alos4
a4lo4u2
al3ous
a5low
al5pen
al3ph2
al5tati
al3tie2
alu3b
al5u4ed
a4lue
al3ues
a5lumn2i1a2
alu4m1n2
alumn1i
al1va
al5ver1
alv5u
2a2ly4
a5lyn1
2a2m
a5mad
ama4g
ama4n5d
a1ma2n
a5marin4e
a1ma2r
amar1i
a3mas.
am1at
a5m4at1i2c
am5a2tu
am4bin
a2m1b
amb2i
3ambu
am5elo
am2e
a3men
am2e4n4d
am3era
amer1
am5erl
am1i
am1i2c
am5ica
am2i1c5r2
3ami2d
a3mili
am2il
am5i2ly
amin2i4f
am2in1i
am5in1iz
am4inos4
am2ino
a5m2is.
a4mium.
a3m2i1u2
ami3um
a3m4on
a1mo
amor5a
am2ort3
am5ose
am2p
am5p4er3i
amper1
amph2i5g
amp3li
amp2l2
ampo5l
am3po
am3ul
amyl5
a2my
a2n
an2a
a5nadi4
an3ae
an3age
an2a5k2
an3ali
an3ar1c2
ana2r
a5nast2
an2as
an4con1
an1c2o2
an3d4at
a4nd
an2da
and5au2
and5eer1
ande2
an5de4l
an5d2i1f
and5ist2
andi4s1
an5dit
an4don1i
an1do
an4ea2
an5eer1
an3ell2
anel5li
an3eu
a2n3ga2n
a4ng
ang2a
angov4
an1go
an4gu4r
an1gu
4an1h2
an3ic
an1i
an2i3f
an5i3fo
4an2i2g
an5ion
an2io2
anis5te2
anist2
4anity
4an2i1u2
an5no
an1n4
4an2ny2
an1o
an2oe
an3o1ma
an2om
anor3
an2os
an5ot
a4n2s
an3s2c2
an4s2c2o2
ans3il
an2si
an4su4r
an3su
an2t2a
ant5a2bl2
an2t1ab
an3t1al
an5t2a2m
an2te
1anth2
an4thi
3an1t2h2r
4ant1ic
ant2i
an4tie2
an4t3i4ng
ant1in
an2t4iv
an4to2n4e
an1t2o
an1t4r2
an4tus
an1tu
an5tym
an2ty
an3ul
an2u
an3um.
an5u4m1s
a3nu4r
a5nut
a2n2y2
an5y1a2
a5ny1i
2ao
aol3i
5aow
2ap
4ap.
4apa
a1pac
ap3al
ap5aro
a1pa2r
ape5li
a5peu
aph5em
aphe4
aph3i
aph5ol
a1pho
a3phy2l3
aph2y
ap1i
ap5icu
ap3in
ap4in4e
a5p2ir
a3pla2n
ap2l2
a1pl2a
ap5li
apo5str2
a1po
a3p4os
apost2
ap4o3th
ap2ot
a2pr2
ap5ron
4a2ps2
apt5at
a2pt2
apu5la2r
apu1l2a
a5p4un1
a4q
a5q2ui2
aqu4
a2r
4arabi
ar1ab
ar2a5bo2
aract4i
ara2ct
ara2g
ar3age
ar4a2g2e4d
ar5a1g2i
ar3ago
a3r2a1j
ar3all2
ar2a3m
ara4n4g
ara2n
aran5te
aran2t
ar5apa
ar2ap
ar1at
a3r2au2
ar2a3v
ar3ba
ar1b
arb5et
ar2b2e
ar4b2i2d
arb2i
ar4bl2
arb3li
ar4bul
ar5chet1
ar1c2
ar2ch
arche2
ar1ch5o
ar5din1a
ar2d2in
ar4do2ne
ar1do
ar3en
ar2e
ar2e4n5d
ar5e2t2t4
ar3e1v5
ar5gh
ar1g2
ar3gu
ar3h2
ar1i
ar5i2ff
ar2i1f
ar4ill2
a5r4i5net
arin4e
ar5in1i
a5rishi
aris2h
arm3er1
arm2e
ar5mi2t
ar3nal
ar2n2
arn1a
ar3nis
arn1i
ar3od
ar5o2i4d3
a4r2oi
aro4mas
ar2om
aro1ma
aro4n
a5roti
ar2ot
a5ro4uc
aro4u2
a4r3o4x
arp5e2r1s2
arpe2
arper1
ar4pu
2a4r1r4
ar2rh2
a2r2s2
ar2s5a2l
ar3so
art5at
art2
ar2th
arth4e2
ar1t2h3r
ar5t1iz
2aru
ar3um
ar5un4
a3ry1o2
a2r2y
a5ry2t
ar5z
as1a
as4af
asa2n2
2asc2
as5con1
as2c2o2
as5c2ot
as2cr2
as2e
as3e2ct
4a2s2ed
ase2p4
ash5ay
as2h
asha2
ash5i4l
as5i2ly
a2s3in
a5s2io4
a3s1it
a4s5iv
ask5er1
as2k2
aske2
aski4
as4l2a
a2sl4
as4lo
2aso
as5o2ch
as2oc
a4s4o2n2ed
as4o2ne
as5or
as3ph2
a4ss2
assa5g2i
as1sa
assa4g
ass5i2bl2
as4s1ib
as4sil
as3s2it5
2asta
ast2
as4tat
as4t2i3a2
as3t1is
as4tit
4asto2
as3tra
astr2
as4tri
as1u
as4un1
as5u4r
2a2ta
4atabi
a2t1ab
a5tal1is
at2a2m4
at2a3p
atar3a
ata2r
ata3s
ata3t4
at3e2au3
atea2
at3e2ch
at5eer1
a5tel.
ate2l
at2e5le
at5enat
aten1a
at3ent
4ater1
at3era
at5er1n3is
ater2n2
atern1i
at5ern3iz
4ate4ss
a2t2es
at5et
4a2th
ath3a4
a3then
athe2
ath5er3in
at4her1
ath5ero
ath5ete
athet1
ath3i
ath3od
a5th2o4n
a1t2h5r
4a3t2i2a2
at1i2c
at5icis
at2i1c2i2
ati5cit
at5ic1iz
a2t2i1f2
a4t1i4l
a4tim
a2t3in
4atin1a
at5i4ng
4at4is.
a2t1is
at1it
atit3u
atitud5i
4a3t2i1u2
at4ivi
a2t1iv
a5tiv1iz
a2to
5at5od
4a1t2o1g
2atol
4aton
a3t2oo
a4to2ps2
a5t4oria2n
at1or
ator1i
ator2i1a2
a4to2r2y
atos4
a5t2oz
2a2tr2
at3ra
a4tr2e
5at5re4s4s
at1ri
a3t2r2ic5u
at3ron
at5ro4u2
at4tag
a2t1t4
atta4
2a2tu
at1ul
atu4m
at3ur1a
atu4r
at3ur1g2
4a2ty
2au2
4au.
au1b5i
4a4uc
au5cer1
au1c3o2
au4d5er1
aud4e
audic4
aul3i
aul4t
aul5t4ed
aul1te
ault5er1
ault5i
au3ma
aun2
aun5ch4ie2
aun2ch
au4n3d
aun4dr2e
aundr2
au5reo
au4r
aur2e
aur4o
au5ror
4aus.
aus5er1
aus5p
au4s4t4ed
a4ust2
auste2
aut3a2r
aut3er1
au3th
2av
a2v4ab
ava4g
av3a4ge
ava5l2a
av5alr4
av5ant
ava2n
av5a2r
avas3
av3e4nd
av3er2n2
aver1
av3ig
av4i1ol4
a3v2i1o2
av1is
aw5er.
awer1
aw5e2r1s2
aw1i2
aw5n2ie2
awn1i
aw5y2
a4x
ax2i2d
ax1i
4ay
ay5l2a
ay3m
ayn4
a4y2s2
ay5si
ay5sta
ays1t2
ayth4
2az2
az3a2r
az1a1
aze4
az5ee
azy1g4
azz4l
azz2
2ba.
ba5b2ir4
b1ab
3back1
baen4
bag4a
5b2ah
b2a4i2
bal3a
balm5i
balm2
ba5lon
bal5u
bam4a
b2a2m
ban4a
ba2n
ba5na2n
b4ane
5ba4ng
b4aniti
ban1i
b4a4n2s
b2a4p1
5bar1b
ba2r
bar4d
bardi4
